incubator/apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ним</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>воно</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>них</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pprep"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їм</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>їх</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>них</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pprep"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>них</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ними</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вони</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="аболіціонізм/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ів</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="брат/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ові</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ові</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ів</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ів</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ім/'я__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'я</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ені</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ені</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'я</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'ям</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ені</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'я</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ена</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ен</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>енам</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ена</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>енами</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>енах</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ена</l>
          <r>'я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="аболіціонізм"><i>аболіціонізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ім'я"><i>ім</i><par n="ім/'я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="брат"><i>брат</i><par n="брат/__n"/></e>
